ja: 真珠光沢等級: エクセレント; フェア; グッド; プア; ベリーグッド; その他
sv: Grad för pärlglans: Utmärkt; Godkänd; Bra; Dålig; Mycket bra; Övrigt
el: Βαθμός λάμψης μαργαριταριών: Εξαιρετική; Ικανοποιητική; Καλή; Κακή; Πολύ καλή; Άλλο
pt-BR: Pérola grau de lustre: Excelente; Razoável; Bom; Ruim; Muito bom; Outro
vi: Độ bóng ngọc trai: Xuất sắc; Khá; Tốt; Kém; Rất tốt; Khác
ru: Градация блеска жемчуга: Отличный; Посредственный; Хороший; Плохой; Очень хороший; Другое
fr: Grade de lustre de la perle: Excellent; Passable; Bon; Médiocre; Très bon; Autre
lt-LT: Perlų blizgesio klasė: Puikus; Patenkinamas; Geras; Prastas; Labai geras; Kita
bg-BG: Степен на блясък на перлата: Отличен; Задоволителен; Добър; Слаб; Много добър; Друго
ro-RO: Gradul de luciu al perlelor: Excelent; Acceptabil; Bun; Slab; Foarte bun; Altele
tr: İnci parlaklık derecesi: Mükemmel; Orta; İyi; Zayıf; Çok iyi; Diğer
en: Pearl luster grade: Excellent; Fair; Good; Poor; Very good; Other
nl: Parel glans klasse: Uitstekend; Redelijk; Goed; Slecht; Zeer goed; Overig
zh-CN: 珍珠光泽等级: 极好; 一般; 好; 差; 很好; 其他
ko: 진주 광택 등급: 엑설런트; 페어; 굿; 푸어; 베리 굿; 기타
it: Grado di lucentezza della perla: Eccellente; Discreto; Buono; Scarso; Molto buono; Altro
th: เกรดความแวววาวมุก: ดีเยี่ยม; พอใช้; ดี; ต่ำ; ดีมาก; อื่นๆ
nb: Perleglans-grad: Utmerket; Akseptabel; God; Dårlig; Veldig god; Annet
zh-TW: 珍珠光澤等級: 極佳; 尚可; 佳; 差; 很好; 其他
es: Grado de brillo perlado: Excelente; Regular; Bueno; Deficiente; Muy bueno; Otro
de: Glanzgrad der Perle: Hervorragend; Ausreichend; Gut; Mangelhaft; Sehr gut; Sonstige
pt-PT: Grau de brilho nacarado: Excelente; Razoável; Bom; Mau; Muito bom; Outro
sk-SK: Stupeň lesku perál: Vynikajúci; Uspokojivý; Dobrý; Slabý; Veľmi dobrý; Iné
hu: Gyöngy fényének minősége: Kiváló; Elfogadható; Jó; Gyenge; Nagyon jó; Egyéb
fi: Helmen kiillon luokka: Erinomainen; Tyydyttävä; Hyvä; Huono; Erittäin hyvä; Muu
pl: Klasa połysku perły: Doskonały; Dostateczny; Dobry; Słaby; Bardzo dobry; Inne
da: Perlens glansgrad: Fremragende; Middel; God; Dårlig; Meget god; Andet
cs: Stupeň lesku perly: Vynikající; Přijatelný; Dobrý; Špatný; Velmi dobrý; Ostatní
sl-SI: Razred leska biserov: Odlično; Zadovoljivo; Dobro; Slabo; Zelo dobro; Drugo
hr-HR: Stupanj bisernog sjaja: Odličan; Osrednji; Dobar; Slab; Vrlo dobar; Ostalo